Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-6,175
School bus;
safety requirements; use of stop signal arm; use of warning signal lights;
violations; penalty.

(1) Upon meeting or overtaking,
from the front or rear, any school bus on which the yellow warning
signal lights are flashing, the driver of a motor vehicle shall reduce the
speed of such vehicle to not more than twenty-five miles per hour, shall bring
such vehicle to a complete stop when the school bus is stopped, the stop signal arm is extended, and the flashing red signal lights are
turned on, and shall remain stopped until the flashing red signal lights are turned off, the
stop signal arm is retracted, and
the school bus resumes motion. This section shall not apply to approaching traffic in
the opposite direction on a divided highway or to approaching traffic when
there is displayed a sign as provided in subsection (8) of
this section directing traffic to proceed. Any person violating this subsection
shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor,
shall be fined five hundred dollars, and shall be assessed points on his or
her motor vehicle operator's license pursuant to section 60-4,182.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (8) of
this section, the driver of any school bus, when stopping to receive or discharge
pupils, shall turn on flashing yellow warning signal lights
at a distance of not less than three hundred feet when inside the corporate
limits of any city or village and not less than five hundred feet nor more
than one thousand feet in any area outside the corporate limits of any city
or village from the point where such pupils are to be received or discharged
from the bus. At the point of receiving or discharging pupils, the bus driver
shall bring the school bus to a stop, extend a stop signal arm, and turn on the flashing red signal
lights. After receiving or discharging pupils, the bus driver
shall turn off the flashing red signal
lights, retract the stop signal arm, and then proceed on the route.

(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision
(b) of this subsection, no school
bus shall stop to load or unload pupils unless there is at least four hundred
feet of clear vision in each direction of travel.

(b) If four
hundred feet of clear vision in each direction of travel is not possible as
determined by the school district, a school bus may stop to load or unload
pupils if there is proper signage installed indicating that a school bus stop
is ahead.

(4) All pupils shall be received
and discharged from the right front entrance of every school bus. If such
pupils must cross a roadway, the bus driver shall instruct such pupils to
cross in front of the school bus and the bus driver shall keep such school
bus halted with the flashing red signal
lights turned on and the stop signal arm extended until such pupils have reached
the opposite side of such roadway.

(5) The driver of a vehicle
upon a divided highway need not stop upon meeting or passing a school bus
which is on a different roadway or when upon a freeway and such school bus
is stopped in a loading zone which is a part of or adjacent to such highway
and where pedestrians are not permitted to cross the roadway.

(6) Every school bus shall
bear upon the front and rear thereof plainly visible signs containing the
words school bus in letters not less than eight inches high.

(7) When a school bus is being
operated upon a highway for purposes other than the actual transportation
of children either to or from school or
school-sponsored activities, all markings thereon indicating school
bus shall be covered or concealed. The stop signal arm and system of flashing yellow warning signal lights and flashing red signal lights shall not be
operable through the usual controls.

(8) When a school bus is (a)
parked in a designated school bus loading area which is out of the flow of
traffic and which is adjacent to a school site or (b) parked on a roadway
which possesses more than one lane of traffic flowing in the same direction
and which is adjacent to a school site, the bus driver shall engage only the hazard warning flasher lights
when receiving or discharging pupils if a school bus loading area warning
sign is displayed. Such signs shall not be directly attached to any school
bus but shall be free standing and placed at the rear of a parked school bus
or line of parked school buses. No school district shall utilize a school
bus loading area warning sign unless such sign complies with the requirements
of section 60-6,176.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 60;

Laws 1974, LB 863, § 2;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 11;

Laws 1987, LB 347, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-660;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 271;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB1039, § 2.